District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1217.11

Council authorized to open, extend, or widen streets; damages and costs.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 704, 30 DCR 148
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 16, 30 DCR 3341

History

1981 Ed., § 7-201.

Prior Codifications